zh-CN: 地板附件: 一体式; 无; 可拆卸; 其他
sk-SK: Zahrnutie podlahy: Pripojená; Žiadna; Odnímateľná; Iné
fr: Plancher inclus: Attaché; Aucun; Amovible; Autre
ko: 바닥 포함 여부: 부착됨; 없음; 분리 가능; 기타
th: การรวมพื้น: ติดตั้งในตัว; ไม่มี; ถอดออกได้; อื่นๆ
nl: Grondzeil inbegrepen: Vast; Geen; Uitneembaar; Overige
ru: Наличие пола: Прикреплено; Нет; Съемное; Другое
fi: Lattiapohja mukana: Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Irrotettava; Muu
el: Συμπερίληψη δαπέδου: Προσαρτημένος; Κανένας; Αφαιρούμενος; Άλλο
pt-BR: Inclusão de piso: Anexado; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
tr: Zemin dahil durumu: Sabit; Yok; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
da: Gulv inkluderet: Fastgjort; Ingen; Aftagelig; Andet
vi: Có bao gồm sàn không: Liền; Không; Tháo rời; Khác
cs: Zahrnutí podlahy: Připojená; Žádná; Odnímatelná; Ostatní
hr-HR: Uključivanje poda: Pričvršćeno; Nema; Uklonjivo; Ostalo
zh-TW: 地板包含情況: 附加式; 無; 可拆式; 其他
ja: 床材: 取り付け済み; なし; 取り外し可能; その他
nb: Inkludering av gulv: Festet; Ingen; Avtakbar; Annet
en: Floor inclusion: Attached; None; Removable; Other
ro-RO: Incluziunea podelei: Atașat; Niciunul; Detașabil; Altele
es: Inclusión del suelo: Fijo; Ninguno; Extraíble; Otro
pt-PT: Inclusão de piso: Fixo; Nenhum; Amovível; Outro
hu: Padlóburkolat: Rögzített; Nincs; Kivehető; Egyéb
sv: Ingående golv: Fäst; Ingen; Löstagbar; Övrigt
it: Inclusione del pavimento: Attaccato; Nessuno; Rimovibile; Altro
sl-SI: Vključitev tal: Pritrjeno; Brez; Odstranljivo; Drugo
lt-LT: Grindų įtraukimas: Pritvirtintas; Nėra; Išimamas; Kita
pl: Podłoga w zestawie: Przymocowane; Brak; Wyjmowane; Inne
de: Boden enthalten: Befestigt; Keiner; Herausnehmbar; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Включен под: Прикрепено; Без; Подвижно; Друго